Illinois, session 104th, HB3583.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Motor 5Fuel Minimum Markup Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. 7As used in this Act: 8    "Average posted terminal price" means the average posted 9rack price, as published by a petroleum price reporting 10service, at which motor fuel is offered for sale at the close 11of business on the determination date by all refiners and 12wholesalers of motor fuel at a terminal plus any excise, sales 13or use taxes imposed on the motor fuel or on its sale, any cost 14incurred for transportation and any other charges that are not 15otherwise included in the average posted rack price. In this 16paragraph, "average" means the arithmetic mean. 17    "Cost to retailer" means: 18        (1) In the case of the retail sale of motor fuel by a 19    refiner at a retail station owned or operated either 20    directly or indirectly by the refiner, the refiner's 21    lowest selling price to other retailers or to wholesalers 22    of motor fuel on the date of the refiner's retail sale, 23    less all trade discounts except customary discounts for   HB3583- 2 -LRB104 12144 SPS 22243 b1    cash, plus any excise, sales or use taxes imposed on the 2    motor fuel or on its sale and any cost incurred for 3    transportation and any other charges not otherwise 4    included in the invoice cost of the motor fuel, plus a 5    markup of OPIS plus one cent to cover a proportionate part 6    of the cost of doing business; or the average posted 7    terminal price at the terminal located closest to the 8    retail station plus a markup of OPIS plus one cent to cover 9    a proportionate part of the cost of doing business, 10    whichever is greater. 11        (2) In the case of the retail sale of motor fuel by a 12    wholesaler, who is not a refiner, at a retail station 13    owned or operated either directly or indirectly by the 14    wholesaler, the invoice cost of the motor fuel to the 15    wholesaler at least 10 days before the date of sale, or the 16    replacement cost of the motor fuel, whichever is lower, 17    less all trade discounts except customary discounts for 18    cash, plus any excise, sales or use taxes imposed on the 19    motor fuel or on its sale, and any cost incurred for 20    transportation and any other charges not otherwise 21    included in the invoice cost or replacement cost of the 22    motor fuel, plus a markup of OPIS plus one cent to cover a 23    proportionate part of the cost of doing business; or the 24    average posted terminal price at the terminal located 25    closest to the retail station plus a markup of OPIS plus 26    one cent to cover a proportionate part of the cost of doing   HB3583- 3 -LRB104 12144 SPS 22243 b1    business, whichever is greater. 2        (3) In the case of the retail sale of motor fuel by a 3    person other than a refiner or a wholesaler at a retail 4    station, the invoice cost of the motor fuel to the 5    retailer at least 10 days before the date of sale, or the 6    replacement cost of the motor fuel, whichever is lower, 7    less all trade discounts except customary discounts for 8    cash, plus any excise, sales or use taxes imposed on the 9    motor fuel or on its sale and any cost incurred for 10    transportation and any other charges not otherwise 11    included in the invoice cost or the replacement cost of 12    the motor fuel, plus a markup of OPIS plus one cent to 13    cover a proportionate part of the cost of doing business; 14    or the average posted terminal price at the terminal 15    located closest to the retailer plus a markup of OPIS plus 16    one cent price to cover a proportionate part of the cost of 17    doing business, whichever is greater. 18        (4) In the case of a retail sale of motor fuel by a 19    refiner at a place other than a retail station, the 20    refiner's lowest selling price to other retailers or to 21    wholesalers of motor fuel on the date of the refiner's 22    retail sale, less all trade discounts except customary 23    discounts for cash, plus any excise, sales or use taxes 24    imposed on the motor fuel or on its sale and any cost 25    incurred for transportation and any other charges not 26    otherwise included in the invoice cost of the motor fuel   HB3583- 4 -LRB104 12144 SPS 22243 b1    to which shall be added a markup to cover a proportionate 2    part of the cost of doing business, which markup, in the 3    absence of proof of a lesser cost, shall be OPIS plus one 4    cent of the cost to the retailer. 5        (5) In the case of a retail sale of motor fuel by a 6    person other than a refiner at a place other than a retail 7    station, the invoice cost of the motor fuel to the 8    retailer at least 10 days before the date of the sale, or 9    the replacement cost of the motor fuel, whichever is 10    lower, less all trade discounts except customary discounts 11    for cash, plus any excise, sales or use taxes imposed on 12    the motor fuel or on its sale and any cost incurred for 13    transportation and any other charges not otherwise 14    included in the invoice cost or the replacement cost of 15    the motor fuel to which shall be added a markup to cover a 16    proportionate part of the cost of doing business, which 17    markup, in the absence of proof of a lesser cost, shall be 18    OPIS plus one cent of the cost to the retailer. 19    "Cost to retailer" and "cost to wholesaler" mean bona fide 20costs; and purchases made by retailers, wholesalers, and 21refiners at prices which cannot be justified by prevailing 22market conditions in this State shall not be used in 23determining cost to the retailer and cost to the wholesaler. 24Prices at which purchases of merchandise other than motor fuel 25are made by retailers or wholesalers cannot be justified by 26prevailing market conditions in this State when they are below   HB3583- 5 -LRB104 12144 SPS 22243 b1the lowest prices at which the manufacturer or producer of the 2merchandise sells to other retailers or wholesalers in this 3State. Prices at which sales of motor fuel are made by 4retailers, wholesalers, and refiners cannot be justified by 5prevailing market conditions in this state when they are below 6the applicable cost to retailers and cost to wholesalers. 7        (1) With respect to the wholesale sale of motor fuel 8    by a refiner, "cost to wholesaler" means the refiner's 9    lowest selling price to other retailers or to wholesalers 10    of motor fuel on the date of the refiner's wholesale sale, 11    less all trade discounts except customary discounts for 12    cash, plus any excise, sales or use taxes imposed on the 13    motor fuel or on its sale and any cost incurred for 14    transportation and any other charges not otherwise 15    included in the invoice cost of the motor fuel, to which 16    shall be added a markup to cover a proportionate part of 17    the cost of doing business, which markup, in the absence 18    of proof of a lesser cost, shall be 3% of the cost to the 19    wholesaler as set forth in this subdivision. 20        (2) With respect to the wholesale sale of motor fuel 21    by a person other than a refiner, "cost to wholesaler" 22    means the invoice cost of the motor fuel to the wholesaler 23    at least 10 days before the date of the sale or the 24    replacement cost of the motor fuel, whichever is lower, 25    less all trade discounts except customary discounts for 26    cash, plus any excise, sales or use taxes imposed on the   HB3583- 6 -LRB104 12144 SPS 22243 b1    motor fuel or on its sale and any cost incurred for 2    transportation and any other charges not otherwise 3    included in the invoice cost or the replacement cost of 4    the motor fuel to which shall be added a markup to cover a 5    proportionate part of the cost of doing business, which 6    markup, in the absence of proof of a lesser cost, shall be 7    3%of the cost to the wholesaler as set forth in this 8    subdivision. 9    "Determination date" means the day preceding the day of 10the sale at retail of motor fuel. If a retailer sells motor 11fuel on a day other than the day on which the retailer last 12purchased any motor fuel and the sale of the motor fuel by the 13retailer occurs at least 10 days after its last purchase by the 14retailer, "determination date" means the following dates 15selected by the retailer:16        (1) the day preceding the day of the sale of motor 17    vehicle fuel by the retailer; or18        (2) the day on which motor vehicle fuel was last 19    purchased by the retailer.20    "Existing price of a competitor" means a price being 21simultaneously offered to a buyer for merchandise of like 22quality and quantity by a person who is a direct competitor of 23the retailer, wholesaler, or refiner and from whom the buyer 24can practicably purchase the merchandise. 25    "Oil Price Information Service" or "OPIS" means the daily 26publication containing oil price information that is a widely   HB3583- 7 -LRB104 12144 SPS 22243 b1accepted independent fuel price benchmark for supply. 2    "Petroleum price reporting service" means a wholesale 3petroleum product price reporting service that is recognized 4nationwide. 5    "Refiner" means a manufacturer, producer or refiner of 6motor fuel. 7    "Replacement cost" means the cost computed at which the 8merchandise sold could have been bought by the retailer or 9wholesaler at any time if bought in the same quantity as the 10retailer or wholesaler's last purchase of the merchandise. 11    "Retailer" includes every person engaged in the business 12of making motor fuel sales at retail in this State, but, in the 13case of a person engaged in the business of selling motor fuel 14both at retail and at wholesale, the term shall be applied only 15to the retail portion of the business. 16    "Sell" includes any advertising or offer to sell or any 17transfer of motor fuel where title is retained by the 18retailer, wholesaler, or refiner as security for the payment 19of the purchase price. In determining the selling price of 20merchandise by wholesalers, wholesalers of motor fuel, 21retailers and refiners under this Section, all fractions of a 22cent shall be carried to the next full cent. 23    "Sell at retail" means any transfer for a valuable 24consideration, made in the ordinary course of trade or in the 25usual prosecution of the retailer's business, of title to 26tangible personal property to the purchaser for consumption or   HB3583- 8 -LRB104 12144 SPS 22243 b1use other than resale or further processing or manufacturing. 2    "Sell at wholesale" include any transfer for a valuable 3consideration made in ordinary course of trade or the usual 4conduct of the wholesaler's business, of title to tangible 5personal property to the purchaser for purposes of resale or 6further processing or manufacturing. 7    "Terminal" means a motor fuel storage and distribution 8facility that is supplied by a pipeline or marine vessel, from 9which facility motor fuel may be removed at a rack and from 10which facility at least 3 refiners or wholesalers of motor 11fuel sell motor fuel. For the purposes of this definition, if 2 12or more terminals are included in the same geographic area by a 13petroleum price reporting service, they shall be considered 14one terminal. 15    "Wholesaler" includes: 16        (1) a person who stores motor fuel and sells it 17    through 5 or more retail outlets that the person owns or 18    operates; 19        (2) a person who acquires motor fuel from a refiner or 20    as a sale at wholesale and stores it in a bulk storage 21    facility other than a retail station for further sale and 22    distribution; 23        (3) a person engaged in the business of making sales 24    at wholesale of motor fuel in this State; and 25        (4) a person engaged in the business of selling diesel 26    fuel if that person's sales of diesel fuel accounted for   HB3583- 9 -LRB104 12144 SPS 22243 b1    at least 60% of that person's total sales of motor fuel in 2    the previous year or, if that person did not engage in the 3    business of selling diesel fuel in the previous year, if 4    that person reasonably anticipates that sales of diesel 5    fuel will account for at least 60% of that person's total 6    sales of motor fuel in the current year. 7    Section 10. Prohibition of loss leaders. 8    (a) It is unlawful for a retailer, wholesaler, or refiner 9to sell or offer to sell motor fuel at less than the cost 10provided in subsection (c) with the intent or effect of 11inducing the purchase of other merchandise or diverting trade 12from a competitor. 13    (b) A sale of motor fuel by a retailer, wholesaler, or 14refiner at less than the cost provided in subsection (c) shall 15be prima facie evidence of intent or effect to induce the 16purchase of other merchandise, or to unfairly divert trade 17from a competitor, or to otherwise injure a competitor. 18    (c) For the purposes of this Section: 19        (1) a retailer shall not sell motor fuel at a price 20    greater than the cost to retailer, as specified in Section 21    5; and 22        (2) a wholesaler, or refiner shall not sell motor fuel 23    at a price greater than the cost to wholesaler, as 24    specified in Section 5.   HB3583- 10 -LRB104 12144 SPS 22243 b1    Section 15. Notice requirements. 2    (a) If a retailer, wholesaler, or refiner, acting in good 3faith, lowers the price of motor fuel below the applicable 4price specified in subsection (b) of Section 10 to meet an 5existing price of a competitor, the retailer, wholesaler, or 6refiner shall submit to the Attorney General notification of 7the lower price before the close of business on the day the 8price was lowered in the form and the manner required by the 9Attorney General. 10    (b) A retailer, wholesaler, or refiner that fails to 11comply with subsection (a) creates a rebuttable presumption 12that the retailer, wholesaler, or refiner did not lower the 13price to meet the existing price of a competitor. 14    (c) If a retailer, wholesaler, or refiner complies with 15subsection (a) they shall not be held liable for violating 16this Act. 17    Section 20. Exceptions. This Act does not apply to sales 18at retail or sales at wholesale if motor fuel is sold by a 19person to a wholesaler, who may sell the motor fuel at either 20retail or wholesale. 21    Section 25. Enforcement. A violation of this Act 22constitutes a violation of the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive 23Business Practices Act. All remedies, penalties, and authority 24granted to the Attorney General by that Act shall be available   HB3583- 11 -LRB104 12144 SPS 22243 b1to the Attorney General for the enforcement of this Act. 2    Section 30. Rulemaking. The Attorney General may adopt 3rules to implement and administer this Act. 4    Section 35. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by adding Section HHHH as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/HHHH new)7    Sec. HHHH. Violations of the Motor Fuel Minimum Markup 8Act. Any person who violates the Motor Fuel Minimum Markup Act 9commits an unlawful practice within the meaning of this Act.